src/filters/upcase-guessed_proper-strings.est.xfscript
# Make initial upcasing for guessed words after U.Cap.Obl
# This is because the guesser uses patterns of lower case letters only,
# but orthography requires names to have initial letter upper case
# This script is a mirror copy of downacase-derived_proper-strings...

# ---- starts here: ------

# The value of HypMinFlag depends on the configuration: if hyperminimisation is
# enabled, it will expand to a flag diacritic, if not it will be the empty string.
# This will ensure that lowercasing will work correctly for all proper strings
# independent of configuration. The alternative is to make the flag diacritic
# optional, but then a hyperminimised generator will overgenerate, producing
# an initial capital variant in addition to the lowercase string intended.
# Don't be mislead by the notation: Autoconf also uses @STRING@ notation!
define Flag       "@U.Cap.Obl@"      ;
define CmpHyph    "@U.CmpHyph.TRUE@" ;

#@IF_HFST@define HypMinFlag "@P.LEXNAME.Root@" ;

define up [ 
a -> A,
b -> B,
c -> C,
d -> D,
e -> E,
f -> F,
g -> G,
h -> H,
i -> I,
j -> J,
k -> K,
l -> L,
m -> M,
n -> N,
o -> O,
p -> P,
q -> Q,
r -> R,
s -> S,
t -> T,
u -> U,
v -> V,
w -> W,
x -> X,
y -> Y,
z -> Z,
á -> Á,
č -> Č,
đ -> Đ,
ŋ -> Ŋ,
š -> Š,
ŧ -> Ŧ,
ž -> Ž,
õ -> Õ,
ä -> Ä,
ö -> Ö,
ü -> Ü
|| FLAG _ , FLAG ?* %- _ ] ;

regex up ;

# ---- ends here: ------

# The lower context fixes issue when downcasing words like Davvi-Suopma
# -> davvi-suopmelaš

# Kept for reference: The old version, i.e., 
# The Book's treatment of paloaltolainen and pariisilainen, p. 368 ff.
# Allow optional initial downcasing after @U.Cap.Opt@ 
#A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c, D (->) d, E (->) e, 
#F (->) f, G (->) g, H (->) h, I (->) i, J (->) j, 
#K (->) k, L (->) l, M (->) m, N (->) n, O (->) o, 
#P (->) p, Q (->) q, R (->) r, S (->) s, T (->) t, 
#U (->) u, V (->) v, W (->) w, X (->) x, Y (->) y, 
#Z (->) z, Á (->) á,
#Č (->) č, Đ (->) đ, Ŋ (->) ŋ, Š (->) š, Ŧ (->) ŧ, Ž (->) ž
#|| .#. %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ _ 
#.o. 
# No uppercase in the middle of a downcasable word
#A->a, B->b, C->c, D->d, E->e, F->f, G->g, H->h,
#I->i, J->j, K->k, L->l, M->m, N->n, O->o, P->p,
#Q->q, R->r, S->s, T->t, U->u, V->v, W->w, X->x,
#Y->y, Z->z  || %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ ?+ _
#.o. 
# Eliminate internal spaces inside a downcasable word 
# Spaces are indicated here with the literal 
# underscore character 
#%_  -> [] || .#. %@U%.Cap%.Obl%@ ?+ _ 

substitute defined Flag       for FLAG

#substitute defined CmpHyph    for HYPHFLAG
#substitute defined CmpFlags   for CMPFLAG
##@IF_HFST@substitute defined HypMinFlag for HYPMINFLAG
